Louisiana, session 2026, SB117.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1276 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1276. Congressional districts
Louisiana shall be divided into six congressional districts, and the
qualified electors of each district shall elect one representative to the United
States House of Representatives. The districts shall be composed as follows:
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 13, 14, 15, 18, 21, 22, 25, 26, 27, 33,
34, 35, 41, 43 and 69 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11,
12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34,
35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62,
63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86,
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106, 117,
118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 132, 134,
136, 192, 198, 199, 246, 247, 248, 1-GI, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H,
1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K,
13-KA, 14-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 34-K, 35-K and
1-L of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 3-3, 3-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 7-4, 8-1,
9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-4, 10-6, 10-8, 10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14,
10-15, 10-16, 11-1, 11-2, 11-3 and 11-5 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts 13A, 13B,
14, 15, 16, 17, 22, 31, 32 and 38 of Livingston Parish; Precincts 4-7, 4-8, 4-9,
4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 5-16,
5-17, 5-18, 6-9, 7-41, 7-42, 9-45, 9-45A, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 11-11, 12-5,
12-6, 12-7, 12-9, 12-10, 13-5, 13-7, 13-8, 14-1, 14-2, 14-3, 14-4, 14-5, 14-6, 14-7,
14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15, 14-16, 14-17, 14-18A, 14-20, 14-21,
16-1, 16-1A, 17-1, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A, 17-19 and 17-20 of Orleans Parish;
Plaquemines Parish; Precincts 32, 33, 34, 41, 42A, 43, 44, 45, 46, 50, 51, 52, 53,
54 and 55 of St. Bernard Parish; Precincts 1-6, 2-6, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2,
6-3, 6-4 and 6-6 of St. Charles Parish; St. Tammany Parish and Precincts 44, 49,
70, 70A, 71, 72, 72A, 73, 74, 120B, 122A, 122B, 122C, 124, 137, 137A, 137B,
137C, 137D, 139, 141, 141A, 143, 143A, 145, 147, 149, 149A and 151 of
Tangipahoa Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 6, 7, 9, 11, 17, 20, 23, 24, 28, 30, 31,
32, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 42, 44, 45, 47, 48, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 57, 58, 62, 63, 65, 66,
68, 71, 72, 73, 77 and 78 of Ascension Parish; Assumption Parish; Iberville
Parish; Precincts 57, 104, 108, 115, 116, 131, 133, 138, 150A, 150B, 151, 152, 153,
154, 155, 156, 157A, 170, 171, 172, 173, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 179A, 179B, 180,
181, 182, 183, 184, 185A, 185B, 187, 188, 189, 190, 191, 193A, 193B, 194A, 194B,
195, 196, 197A, 197B, 200, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 210, 211, 212, 213A, 213B,
213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A, 216B, 217, 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231, 232A,
232B, 234, 235, 236, 237, 238A, 238B, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G,
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
9-G, 10-G, 11-G, 12-G, 13-G, 13-KB, 15-K, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 30-K,
31-K, 33-K, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W, 6-W and 7-W of Jefferson Parish; Precincts
1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-3, 2-5, 2-7, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-16, 5-1, 5-1A and
5-3 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 2-6, 2-7, 3-1,
3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 4-2, 4-3, 4-6, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7, 5-8,
5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A,
7-10, 7-11, 7-12, 7-13, 7-14, 7-15, 7-16, 7-17, 7-18, 7-19, 7-20, 7-21, 7-23, 7-24,
7-25, 7-25A, 7-26, 7-27, 7-27B, 7-28, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37,
7-37A, 7-40, 8-1, 8-2, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 8-12, 8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20,
8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 8-28, 8-30, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8,
9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-17, 9-19, 9-21, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26, 9-28,
9-28C, 9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D, 9-32, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35,
9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A, 9-40C, 9-41,
9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E, 9-43F,
9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-43M, 9-43N, 9-44, 9-44A, 9-44B,
9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J, 9-44L, 9-44M, 9-44N, 9-44O, 9-44P,
9-44Q, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-2, 11-3, 11-12,
11-13, 11-14, 11-17, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16,
12-17, 12-19, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-6, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11, 13-12, 13-13, 13-14,
13-15, 13-16, 14-12, 14-19, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-25, 14-26, 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5,
15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14,
15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A,
15-15B, 15-16, 15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D,
15-18E, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A, 15-19B, 15-19C, 16-2, 16-3, 16-4, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7,
16-8, 16-9, 17-2, 17-3, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8, 17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12,
17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15 and 17-16 of Orleans Parish; Precincts 10, 11, 12,
13, 14, 15, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 30, 31, 40 and 42 of St. Bernard Parish;
Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-3,
5-4, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4 and 7-5 of St. Charles Parish; St. James Parish and St.
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
John the Baptist Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Acadia Parish; Precincts 167, 260, 261, 262,
300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309E, 309W, 310, 311, 312, 313E,
313W, 314, 315E, 315W, 316E, 316W, 317, 318, 319N, 319S, 320E, 320W, 321,
322, 323, 324, 325, 326, 327, 328, 329, 330, 331, 332N, 332S, 333, 334, 335, 336,
337, 338, 339, 340, 360, 361, 362, 363, 364, 368, 369, 370, 372, 405, 440, 441, 463,
464, 467, 800, 801, 860S, 861E and 861W of Calcasieu Parish; Cameron Parish;
Iberia Parish; Jefferson Davis Parish; Precincts 1, 3, 8, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31,
32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 65, 66, 67, 69, 70,
71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93,
94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111,
114, 115, 116, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 123, 124, 125, 126, 127, 128, 130, 133, 134,
135 and 136 of Lafayette Parish; Precincts 1-1, 2-2, 2-6, 2-8, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14,
2-15, 3-1, 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-7, 5-2, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3 and 11-4 of
Lafourche Parish; St. Martin Parish; St. Mary Parish; Terrebonne Parish and
Vermilion Parish.
(4) District 4 is composed of Allen Parish; Beauregard Parish; Bienville
Parish; Bossier Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8, 1-9, 1-10,
1-11, 1-12, 1-13, 1-14, 2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 2-7, 3-1, 3-8, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7,
4-8, 4-9, 4-10, 5-10, 6-1, 7-1, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-4, 8-5, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3,
9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 10-2, 11-1, 11-2, 11-3, 11-6, 11-7,
11-9, 11-10, 12-1, 12-3, 12-7, 12-8 and 12-9 of Caddo Parish; Precincts 160E,
160W, 161, 162E, 162W, 163, 164, 165, 166E, 166W, 365, 366, 367, 371N, 371S,
400, 401, 402, 403, 404, 406, 407, 408, 460E, 460W, 461, 465, 466E, 466W, 468,
469, 560, 561, 562, 600, 601, 602, 603, 660, 661, 662, 663, 664, 700, 701, 702, 703,
760, 761, 762 and 860N of Calcasieu Parish; Claiborne Parish; Precincts 10, 11,
16, 23, 28, 30A, 34, 35, 46 and 51 of De Soto Parish; Evangeline Parish; Grant
Parish; Jackson Parish; Lincoln Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 25, 32, 33, 38, 41,
43, 44, 44A, 45, 49, 50, 51, 51A, 53, 55, 57, 58, 61, 64, 71, 75, 76 and 77 of
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
Ouachita Parish; Precincts C22, C23, C35, C37-A, C37-B, C41, S7, S8, S9, S10,
S11, S13, S14, S21, S22, S23, S24, S25, S26, S27, S28 and S29 of Rapides Parish;
Red River Parish; Sabine Parish; Union Parish; Vernon Parish; Webster Parish
and Winn Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, 10, 12, 16, 19, 61, 64
and 76 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 2-2, 2-2A, 2-2C, 2-4,
2-4A, 2-5, 2-7, 2-8, 3-1A, 4-1, 4-2, 4-2A (Part) that portion north of Bayou du
Lac, 5-1A, 6-1, 6-2, 6-2A and 7-3 of Avoyelles Parish; Caldwell Parish;
Catahoula Parish; Concordia Parish; Precincts 1-12, 1-34, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44,
1-46, 1-47, 1-49, 1-56, 1-69, 1-74, 1-75, 1-76, 1-79, 1-80, 1-99, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107,
2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17,
3-18, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23, 3-25, 3-26, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37,
3-38, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-43, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-51, 3-53, 3-58, 3-60,
3-61, 3-62, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-71, 3-73 and 3-74 of East Baton Rouge
Parish; East Carroll Parish; East Feliciana Parish; Franklin Parish; La Salle
Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A, 3, 3A, 3B, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 5A, 5B, 5D, 6,
6A, 6B, 7, 7A, 7B, 7C, 7D, 8A, 8B, 9, 10, 11, 11A, 12, 18, 18A, 19, 19A, 20, 21,
21A, 21B, 23, 23A, 23B, 23C, 24, 24B, 24C, 24D, 25, 26, 26A, 26B, 26C, 27, 28,
29, 30, 33, 34, 35, 35A, 36, 36A, 39, 39A, 39B, 40, 40A, 41 and 43 of Livingston
Parish; Madison Parish; Morehouse Parish; Precincts 3, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 9A, 10, 11,
12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 34, 35, 36, 37, 39,
40, 42, 46, 47, 48, 52, 52A, 54, 56, 56A, 59, 60, 62, 63, 65, 65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70,
72, 73, 74, 78 and 79 of Ouachita Parish; Richland Parish; St. Helena Parish;
Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15, 16, 17, 28, 33, 40A, 41, 42, 43, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 101, 102,
104, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111A, 112, 114, 115B, 116, 117, 118, 118A,
119, 120, 120A, 121, 121A, 123, 125, 127, 129A, 133 and 133A of Tangipahoa
Parish; Tensas Parish; Washington Parish; West Carroll Parish and West
Feliciana Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 3-1, 3-3, 4-2A (Part) that portion
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
south of Bayou du Lac, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-3A, 9-1, 9-2, 9-2A, 9-3, 9-5, 10-2,
10-2A, 10-3A, 10-3B, 10-4, 11-1 and 11-2 of Avoyelles Parish; Precincts 2-3, 2-5,
2-6, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5,
5-6, 5-7, 5-8, 5-9, 5-11, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 6-9, 6-10, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 7-5,
7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9, 7-10, 10-1, 10-3, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 11-4, 11-5,
11-8, 12-2, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-10 and 12-11 of Caddo Parish; Precincts 1, 4, 5,
9, 22, 26, 30, 31, 32, 33, 38, 42, 46B, 53, 56 and 59 of De Soto Parish; Precincts
1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8, 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18,
1-19, 1-20, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32,
1-33, 1-35, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-39, 1-40, 1-45, 1-48, 1-50, 1-51, 1-52, 1-53, 1-54,
1-55, 1-57, 1-58, 1-59, 1-60, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-67, 1-70, 1-71,
1-72, 1-73, 1-77, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-87, 1-88, 1-89, 1-90,
1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-96, 1-97, 1-98, 1-100, 1-101, 1-102, 1-103, 1-104,
2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19,
2-20, 2-21, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25, 2-26, 2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-30, 2-31, 2-32, 2-34,
2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-8, 3-10, 3-11, 3-12, 3-19, 3-20, 3-24, 3-27, 3-28, 3-32, 3-42,
3-44, 3-50, 3-52, 3-54, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-59, 3-63, 3-69, 3-70, 3-72, 3-75 and 3-76
of East Baton Rouge Parish; Precincts 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 63, 64, 68,
112, 113 and 122 of Lafayette Parish; Natchitoches Parish; Pointe Coupee
Parish; Precincts C1, C2, C3, C4, C5, C6, C7, C8, C9, C10, C11-A, C11-B, C13,
C14, C15, C17, C18, C19, C20, C21, C24, C25, C26, C27, C28, C30, C31, C32,
C33, C34, C36, C38-A, C38-B, C39, C40, C42, N1, N2, N3, N4, N5, N6, N7, N8,
N9, N10, N11, N12, N13-A, N13-B, N14-A, N14-B, N15, N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B,
N19, N20, N21, N22, N23, N24, N25, N26, N27, N28, N29, S1, S2, S4, S5, S6A,
S6B, S15, S16, S17, S18, S19 and S20 of Rapides Parish; St. Landry Parish and
West Baton Rouge Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 18:1276.1 is hereby repealed.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana House of
Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the
Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
18:532 and 532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any person
holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the appointment
or election is based upon a congressional district as composed pursuant to R.S. 18:1276.1.
Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a congressional
district and that is to be filled after January 3, 2029, shall be appointed or elected from a
district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of representatives to the United States Congress at the regularly scheduled
election for representatives to the congress in 2028, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act
shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-144 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 117
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the United States Congress and for
all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at noon on
January 3, 2029.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at noon on January
3, 2029.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.